Utah statutes.
53A-15-1202.   Definitions.

As used in this part:

(1)  "District school" means a public school under the control of a local school board elected pursuant to Title 20A, Chapter 14, Nomination and Election of State and Local School Boards.

(2)  "Eligible student" means:

(a)  a student enrolled in a district school or charter school in Utah; or

(b)  beginning on July 1, 2013, a student:

(i)  who attends a private school or home school; and

(ii)  whose custodial parent or legal guardian is a resident of Utah.

(3)  "LEA" means a local education agency in Utah that has administrative control and direction for public education.

(4)  "Online course" means a course of instruction offered by the Statewide Online Education Program through the use of digital technology.

(5)  "Primary LEA of enrollment" means the LEA in which an eligible student is enrolled for courses other than online courses offered through the Statewide Online Education Program.

(6)  "Released-time" means a period of time during the regular school day a student is excused from school at the request of the student's parent or guardian pursuant to rules of the State Board of Education.



Amended by Chapter 238, 2012 General Session

